Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.160

Classification and salary schedules to consider rates in other public and private employment—Wage and fringe benefits surveys—Limited public disclosure exemption.

In preparing classification and salary schedules as set forth in RCW 41.06.150 the office of financial management shall give full consideration to prevailing rates in other public employment and in private employment in this state. For this purpose the department shall undertake comprehensive salary and fringe benefit surveys.

Salary and fringe benefit survey information collected from private employers which identifies a specific employer with the salary and fringe benefit rates which that employer pays to its employees shall not be subject to public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.

[ 2019 c 146 s 4; 2005 c 274 s 278; 2002 c 354 s 211; 1993 c 281 s 29; 1985 c 94 s 2; 1980 c 11 s 1; 1979 c 151 s 58; 1977 ex.s. c 152 s 2; 1961 c 1 s 16 (Initiative Measure No. 207, approved November 8, 1960).]

NOTES:

Short title—2002 c 354: See RCW 41.80.907.

Effective date—1993 c 281: See note following RCW 41.06.022.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 152: See note following RCW 41.06.150.